District of Columbia statutes.
16-807

Savings provision.

This chapter does not supersede any other provision of the District of Columbia Official Code providing for the expungement, sealing, or setting aside of criminal arrests or convictions.

History

May 5, 2007, D.C. Law 16-307, § 2(b), 54 DCR 868